Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Photovoltaic rebate program (repealed June 30, 2013). L
2008, c 151.

Cross References

Renewable energy
facility siting process, see chapter 201N.

§196-1 Findings and declaration of
necessity. The legislature finds that:

(1) The global demand for petroleum and its
derivatives has resulted in a significant and fundamental market escalation in
oil prices, has caused severe economic hardships throughout the State, and
threatens to impair the public health, safety, and welfare.

The State of Hawaii, with its near total
dependence on imported fossil fuel, is particularly vulnerable to dislocations
in the global energy market. This situation can be changed, as there are few
places in the world so generously endowed with natural energy: geothermal,
solar radiation, ocean temperature differential, wind, biomass, waves, and
currents, which are all potential non-polluting power sources;

(2) There is a real need for comprehensive strategic
planning in the effort towards achieving full use of Hawaii's energy resources
and the most effective allocation of energy resources throughout the State.
Planning is necessary and desirable in order that the State may recognize and
declare the major problems and opportunities in the field of energy resources.
Both short-range and long-range planning will permit the articulation of:

(A) Broad policies, goals, and objectives;

(B) Criteria for measuring and evaluating
accomplishments of objectives;

(C) Identification and implementation of
programs that will carry out such objectives; and

(D) A determination of requirements necessary
for the optimum development of Hawaii's energy resources.

Such planning efforts will identify present
conditions and major problems relating to energy resources, their exploration,
development, production, and distribution. It will show the projected nature
of the situation and rate of change, present conditions for the foreseeable
future based on a projection of current trends in the development of energy
resources in Hawaii, and include initiatives designed to fundamentally change
how Hawaii consumes energy by accelerating the production of renewable and
alternative energy, increasing energy efficiency, developing and adopting new
technologies, and ensuring the State's energy security;

(3) The State requires an in-depth understanding of
the causes and effects of any transitional issues and trends related to changes
in the State's energy resources, systems, and markets;

(4) There are many agencies of the federal, state,
and county governments in Hawaii, as well as many private agencies and a broad
set of non-governmental entities, engaged in, or expressing an interest in,
various aspects of the exploration, research, distribution, transportation, storage,
conservation, and production of all forms of energy resources in Hawaii. Some
of these agencies include the University of Hawaii; the department of land and
natural resources; the department of business, economic development, and
tourism; the division of consumer advocacy; the public utilities commission;
the state emergency management agency; the federal energy office; and various
county agencies, as well as Hawaii's energy and energy-related companies; and

(5) There is an ongoing need in this State to
coordinate the efforts of statewide industry and government energy interests;
maintain the technical capability and adequate capacity to quantitatively and
qualitatively evaluate, analyze, develop, and coordinate implementation of
private and public sector energy planning efforts; recommend market-based
policies to develop Hawaii's energy resources, systems, and markets; establish
and coordinate programs to preserve and protect the State's energy security,
maintain a robust energy emergency preparedness program, and effectuate the
conservation of energy resources to provide for the equitable distribution
thereof; and to formulate plans for the development and use of alternative
energy sources. There is a need for coordination, capability, and capacity, so
that there will be maximum conservation and use of energy resources in the State.
[L 1974, c 237, §1; am L 1987, c 336, §7; am L 1990, c 293, §8; am L 2006, c
96, §5; am L 2009, c 153, §2; L 2014, c 111, §28]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next